Massachusetts, session 194th, H806.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 55 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 22A the following section:-
“SECTION 22B: Persons or corporations making contributions or expenditures to
influence town warrant articles; filing reports with clerk; penalties.
(a) Terms used in this section shall be construed as follows unless a contrary
intention clearly appears:-
“Article”, subjects to be acted upon at a town meeting as referenced in a warrant.
“Town Meeting”, an annual town meeting or special town meeting called
pursuant to chapter 39, section .9
“Warrant”, the call of a town meeting pursuant to chapter 39, section 10.
of 2

(b) Any person, corporation, association, organization or other group of persons,
which has given, paid, or expended, or promised to give, pay or expend, any money or other
thing of value of $1,000 or more in the aggregate in order to influence or affect an article on a
warrant or the vote on any article at a town meeting, shall file reports on a form as prescribed by
the director. The form shall include the date each expenditure was made or liability incurred; the
purpose of the expenditure or liability; the amount of the expenditure; the full name and address
of the person to whom each expenditure was made or liability incurred; the full name and
address of the person, corporation, association, organization or the members of other group of
persons by whom such expenditure was made or liability incurred; and for each gift, payment or
contribution received to make the expenditure or incur the liability (1) the date of receipt; (2) the
amount; and (3) the full name and address from whom each gift, payment or contribution was
received.
(c) Such reports shall be filed with the town clerk as follows: (i) on the fifth day
of each month for any contributions received or expenditures made in the preceding month
through the last day of the preceding month; (ii) on the fifth day preceding a town meeting
complete as to the seventh day preceding the town meeting; and (iii) as a final report, on the
thirtieth day following a town meeting.
(d) This section shall not prohibit any officer, employee or agent of the
commonwealth or its subdivisions from acting in their official capacity or private capacity
relative to an article on a warrant.
(e) Violation of any provision of this section shall be punished by imprisonment
for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or both.
of 2